Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 9

Title VI Implementation Plans

4-21-901. Development of plan — Annual reports.

Each state governmental entity subject to the requirements of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. § 2000d et seq.), and regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, shall develop a Title VI implementation plan with participation by protected beneficiaries as may be required by such law or regulations. To the extent applicable, such plan shall include Title VI implementation plans of any subrecipients of federal funds through the state entity. Each such state governmental entity shall submit annual Title VI compliance reports and implementation plan updates to the human rights commission pursuant to §4-21-203.

Acts 1993, ch. 502, § 1; 2007, ch. 97, § 1; 2010, ch. 765, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For an Order establishing the Tennessee Title VI Compliance Commission, see Executive Order No. 34 (August 9, 2002).

Attorney General Opinions. Title VI implementation plans are to be submitted to the department of audit, and not the human rights commission, OAG 00-107, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 109 (6/12/00).

The Title VI compliance commission is neither authorized nor required to make rules for the administration and handling of allegations of noncompliance with Title VI, OAG 03-161, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 173 (12/10/03).

It is permissible for the Title VI compliance commission to operate under applicable rules of the Tennessee human rights commission for the administration and handling of allegations of noncompliance with Title VI, OAG 03-161, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 173 (12/10/03).

4-21-902. Federal funding.

It is the legislative intent that any increased costs incurred by state entities as a result of this section shall, to the extent legally available, be paid from federal funds available therefor.

Acts 1993, ch. 502, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. Tennessee human rights commission — Authority to investigate “improper administration of justice,” OAG 99-192, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 206 (9/28/99).

4-21-903. [Reserved.]

It is a discriminatory practice for any state agency receiving federal funds making it subject to Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. § 2000d et seq.), or for any person receiving such federal funds from a state agency, to exclude a person from participation in, deny benefits to a person, or to subject a person to discrimination under any program or activity receiving such funds, on the basis of race, color, or national origin.

Acts 1995, ch. 381, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, referred to in this section, is compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d et seq.

Attorney General Opinions. The human rights commission has authority to process complaints alleging violations of T.C.A. §4-21-904 against state agencies or persons receiving federal funds from a state agency; thus, local government entities, educational institutions, private for profit and non-profit corporations can only be included in specific instances where they are considered persons receiving such federal funds from a state agency, OAG 00-107, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 109 (6/12/00).

The human rights commission has no direct authority to monitor recipients and subrecipients of federally funded programs and activities for compliance with the statute, except to the extent that it is implicit in the commission's authority, OAG 00-107, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 109 (6/12/00).

The human rights commission has authority to process complaints alleging violations of T.C.A. §4-21-904, which includes the authority to investigate such complaints under T.C.A. §4-21-302; the commission is also authorized to review complaints filed with state agencies under T.C.A. §4-21-905 to determine whether Title VI of the Federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. § 2000d et seq., is applicable, OAG 00-107, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 109 (6/12/00).

4-21-905. Filing a complaint.

Any person claiming to be aggrieved by a discriminatory practice under this part may file a complaint with the state department, agency or entity receiving the funds within one hundred eighty (180) days of the occurrence of the alleged discriminatory act. Any such complaint filed with a state department, agency or entity is subject to review by the Title VI compliance commission for applicability under Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. § 2000d et seq.).

Any person claiming to be aggrieved by a discriminatory practice under this part may also file a complaint with the Title VI compliance commission, in the same manner established in § 4-21-302, for other discriminatory practices. If such a complaint is filed with the Title VI compliance commission pursuant to this section, then the commission shall exercise the same powers and shall observe the same procedures as are set forth in part 3 of this chapter for the human rights commission when complaints of other discriminatory practices are filed with the commission pursuant to § 4-21-302.

Acts 1995, ch. 381, § 1; 2003, ch. 218, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. The human rights commission has authority to process complaints alleging violations of T.C.A. §4-21-904, which includes the authority to investigate such complaints under T.C.A. §4-21-302; the commission is also authorized to review complaints filed with state agencies under T.C.A. §4-21-905 to determine whether Title VI of the Federal Civil Rights Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. § 2000d et seq., is applicable, OAG 00-107, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 109 (6/12/00).